tests/verbs-TAI.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    winkam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwinkamkuwa
    winkam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kwinkamkuwaok
    katup<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : katupkuwa
    katup<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : katupkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : knotunkuwa
    notun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : knotunkuwaok
    maehel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemaehelkuwa
    maehel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kemaehelkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    winkam<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : winkamkuwoo
    katup<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : katupawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : notunkuwoo
    maehel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : maehelkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : mpeshukw
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : mpeshukuk
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntoskipehakw
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntoskipehkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newihelakw
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newihelkuk
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkwishelemakw
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkwishelemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kpeshukw
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuk
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktoskipehakw
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktoskipehkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kwihelakw
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwihelkuk
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kwishelemakw
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwishelemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : pweshuku
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : pweshuku
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : toskipehku
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : toskipehku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : wihelku
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wihelku
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kwishelemku
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kwishelemku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpeshukuna
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpeshukunanak
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntoskipehkuna
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntoskipehkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newihelkuna
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newihelkunanak
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkwishelemkuna
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkwishelemkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuna
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpeshukunanak
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktoskipehkuna
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktoskipehkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kwihelkuna
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kwihelkunanak
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kwishelemkuna
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kwishelemkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuwa
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpeshukuwaok
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktoskipehkuwa
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktoskipehkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwihelkuwa
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kwihelkuwaok
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwishelemkuwa
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kwishelemkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pweshukuwoo
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pweshukuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : wihelkuwoo
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kwishelemkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newitaemakw
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newitaemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kwitaemakw
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kwitaemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : witaemku
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : witaemku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newitaemkuna
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newitaemkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kwitaemkuna
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kwitaemkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewitaemkuwa
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kewitaemkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 35) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : witaemkuwoo
    

  
